Illinois, session 104th, SB111.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Section 110-6.1 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/110-6.1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 110-6.1)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-822)8    Sec. 110-6.1. Denial of pretrial release. 9    (a) Upon verified petition by the State, the court shall 10hold a hearing and may deny a defendant pretrial release only 11if:12        (1) the defendant is charged with a felony offense 13    other than a forcible felony for which, based on the 14    charge or the defendant's criminal history, a sentence of 15    imprisonment, without probation, periodic imprisonment or 16    conditional discharge, is required by law upon conviction, 17    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release 18    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person 19    or persons or the community, based on the specific 20    articulable facts of the case;21        (1.5) the defendant's pretrial release poses a real 22    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 23    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts   SB0111- 2 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1    of the case, and the defendant is charged with a forcible 2    felony, which as used in this Section, means treason, 3    first degree murder, second degree murder, predatory 4    criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal 5    sexual assault, criminal sexual assault, armed robbery, 6    aggravated robbery, robbery, burglary where there is use 7    of force against another person, residential burglary, 8    home invasion, vehicular invasion, aggravated arson, 9    arson, aggravated kidnaping, kidnaping, aggravated battery 10    resulting in great bodily harm or permanent disability or 11    disfigurement or any other felony which involves the 12    threat of or infliction of great bodily harm or permanent 13    disability or disfigurement; 14        (2) the defendant is charged with stalking or 15    aggravated stalking, and it is alleged that the 16    defendant's pre-trial release poses a real and present 17    threat to the safety of a victim of the alleged offense, 18    and denial of release is necessary to prevent fulfillment 19    of the threat upon which the charge is based;20        (3) the defendant is charged with a violation of an 21    order of protection issued under Section 112A-14 of this 22    Code or Section 214 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act 23    of 1986, a stalking no contact order under Section 80 of 24    the Stalking No Contact Order Act, or of a civil no contact 25    order under Section 213 of the Civil No Contact Order Act, 26    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release   SB0111- 3 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person 2    or persons or the community, based on the specific 3    articulable facts of the case;4        (4) the defendant is charged with domestic battery or 5    aggravated domestic battery under Section 12-3.2 or 12-3.3 6    of the Criminal Code of 2012 and it is alleged that the 7    defendant's pretrial release poses a real and present 8    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 9    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 10    case;11        (5) the defendant is charged with any offense under 12    Article 11 of the Criminal Code of 2012, except for 13    Sections 11-14, 11-14.1, 11-18, 11-20, 11-30, 11-35, 14    11-40, and 11-45 of the Criminal Code of 2012, or similar 15    provisions of the Criminal Code of 1961 and it is alleged 16    that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real and 17    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or 18    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 19    the case; 20        (6) the defendant is charged with any of the following 21    offenses under the Criminal Code of 2012, and it is 22    alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real 23    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 24    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts 25    of the case:26            (A) Section 24-1.2 (aggravated discharge of a   SB0111- 4 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1        firearm);2            (B) Section 24-2.5 (aggravated discharge of a 3        machine gun or a firearm equipped with a device 4        designed or use for silencing the report of a 5        firearm);6            (C) Section 24-1.5 (reckless discharge of a 7        firearm);8            (D) Section 24-1.7 (armed habitual criminal);9            (E) Section 24-2.2 (manufacture, sale or transfer 10        of bullets or shells represented to be armor piercing 11        bullets, dragon's breath shotgun shells, bolo shells, 12        or flechette shells);13            (F) Section 24-3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 14        firearms);15            (G) Section 24-3.3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 16        firearms on the premises of any school);17            (H) Section 24-34 (unlawful sale of firearms by 18        liquor license);19            (I) Section 24-3.5 (unlawful purchase of a 20        firearm);21            (J) Section 24-3A (gunrunning);22            (K) Section 24-3B (firearms trafficking);23            (L) Section 10-9 (b) (involuntary servitude);24            (M) Section 10-9 (c) (involuntary sexual servitude 25        of a minor);26            (N) Section 10-9(d) (trafficking in persons);  SB0111- 5 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1            (O) Non-probationable violations: (i) unlawful use 2        or possession of weapons by felons or persons in the 3        Custody of the Department of Corrections facilities 4        (Section 24-1.1), (ii) aggravated unlawful use of a 5        weapon (Section 24-1.6), or (iii) aggravated 6        possession of a stolen firearm (Section 24-3.9); 7            (P) Section 9-3 (reckless homicide and involuntary 8        manslaughter);9            (Q) Section 19-3 (residential burglary);10            (R) Section 10-5 (child abduction);11            (S) Felony violations of Section 12C-5 (child 12        endangerment);13            (T) Section 12-7.1 (hate crime); 14            (U) Section 10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful 15        restraint); 16            (V) Section 12-9 (threatening a public official); 17            (W) Subdivision (f)(1) of Section 12-3.05 18        (aggravated battery with a deadly weapon other than by 19        discharge of a firearm); 20        (6.5) the defendant is charged with any of the 21    following offenses, and it is alleged that the defendant's 22    pretrial release poses a real and present threat to the 23    safety of any person or persons or the community, based on 24    the specific articulable facts of the case: 25            (A) Felony violations of Sections 3.01, 3.02, or 26        3.03 of the Humane Care for Animals Act (cruel   SB0111- 6 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1        treatment, aggravated cruelty, and animal torture);2            (B) Subdivision (d)(1)(B) of Section 11-501 of the 3        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 4        influence while operating a school bus with 5        passengers);6            (C) Subdivision (d)(1)(C) of Section 11-501 of the 7        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 8        influence causing great bodily harm);9            (D) Subdivision (d)(1)(D) of Section 11-501 of the 10        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 11        influence after a previous reckless homicide 12        conviction);13            (E) Subdivision (d)(1)(F) of Section 11-501 of the 14        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 15        influence leading to death); or16            (F) Subdivision (d)(1)(J) of Section 11-501 of the 17        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 18        influence that resulted in bodily harm to a child 19        under the age of 16);20        (7) the defendant is charged with an attempt to commit 21    any charge listed in paragraphs (1) through (6.5), and it 22    is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a 23    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 24    persons or the community, based on the specific 25    articulable facts of the case; or 26        (8) the person has a high likelihood of willful flight   SB0111- 7 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1    to avoid prosecution and is charged with:2            (A) Any felony described in subdivisions (a)(1) 3        through (a)(7) of this Section; or4            (B) A felony offense other than a Class 4 offense. 5    (b) If the charged offense is a felony, as part of the 6detention hearing, the court shall determine whether there is 7probable cause the defendant has committed an offense, unless 8a hearing pursuant to Section 109-3 of this Code has already 9been held or a grand jury has returned a true bill of 10indictment against the defendant. If there is a finding of no 11probable cause, the defendant shall be released. No such 12finding is necessary if the defendant is charged with a 13misdemeanor.14    (c) Timing of petition. 15        (1) A petition may be filed without prior notice to 16    the defendant at the first appearance before a judge, or 17    within the 21 calendar days, except as provided in Section 18    110-6, after arrest and release of the defendant upon 19    reasonable notice to defendant; provided that while such 20    petition is pending before the court, the defendant if 21    previously released shall not be detained.22        (2) Upon filing, the court shall immediately hold a 23    hearing on the petition unless a continuance is requested. 24    If a continuance is requested and granted, the hearing 25    shall be held within 48 hours of the defendant's first 26    appearance if the defendant is charged with first degree   SB0111- 8 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1    murder or a Class X, Class 1, Class 2, or Class 3 felony, 2    and within 24 hours if the defendant is charged with a 3    Class 4 or misdemeanor offense. The Court may deny or 4    grant the request for continuance. If the court decides to 5    grant the continuance, the Court retains the discretion to 6    detain or release the defendant in the time between the 7    filing of the petition and the hearing.8    (d) Contents of petition.9        (1) The petition shall be verified by the State and 10    shall state the grounds upon which it contends the 11    defendant should be denied pretrial release, including the 12    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 13    persons or the community, based on the specific 14    articulable facts or flight risk, as appropriate.15        (2) If the State seeks to file a second or subsequent 16    petition under this Section, the State shall be required 17    to present a verified application setting forth in detail 18    any new facts not known or obtainable at the time of the 19    filing of the previous petition.20    (e) Eligibility: All defendants shall be presumed eligible 21for pretrial release, and the State shall bear the burden of 22proving by clear and convincing evidence that:23        (1) the proof is evident or the presumption great that 24    the defendant has committed an offense listed in 25    subsection (a), and26        (2) for offenses listed in paragraphs (1) through (7)   SB0111- 9 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1    of subsection (a), the defendant poses a real and present 2    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 3    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 4    case, by conduct which may include, but is not limited to, 5    a forcible felony, the obstruction of justice, 6    intimidation, injury, or abuse as defined by paragraph (1) 7    of Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 8    1986, and9        (3) no condition or combination of conditions set 10    forth in subsection (b) of Section 110-10 of this Article 11    can mitigate (i) the real and present threat to the safety 12    of any person or persons or the community, based on the 13    specific articulable facts of the case, for offenses 14    listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) of subsection (a), or 15    (ii) the defendant's willful flight for offenses listed in 16    paragraph (8) of subsection (a), and17        (4) for offenses under subsection (b) of Section 407 18    of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act that are subject 19    to paragraph (1) of subsection (a), no condition or 20    combination of conditions set forth in subsection (b) of 21    Section 110-10 of this Article can mitigate the real and 22    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or 23    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 24    the case, and the defendant poses a serious risk to not 25    appear in court as required.26    (f) Conduct of the hearings.  SB0111- 10 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1        (1) Prior to the hearing, the State shall tender to 2    the defendant copies of the defendant's criminal history 3    available, any written or recorded statements, and the 4    substance of any oral statements made by any person, if 5    relied upon by the State in its petition, and any police 6    reports in the prosecutor's possession at the time of the 7    hearing.8        (2) The State or defendant may present evidence at the 9    hearing by way of proffer based upon reliable information.10        (3) The defendant has the right to be represented by 11    counsel, and if he or she is indigent, to have counsel 12    appointed for him or her. The defendant shall have the 13    opportunity to testify, to present witnesses on his or her 14    own behalf, and to cross-examine any witnesses that are 15    called by the State. Defense counsel shall be given 16    adequate opportunity to confer with the defendant before 17    any hearing at which conditions of release or the 18    detention of the defendant are to be considered, with an 19    accommodation for a physical condition made to facilitate 20    attorney/client consultation. If defense counsel needs to 21    confer or consult with the defendant during any hearing 22    conducted via a two-way audio-visual communication system, 23    such consultation shall not be recorded and shall be 24    undertaken consistent with constitutional protections. 25        (3.5) A hearing at which pretrial release may be 26    denied must be conducted in person (and not by way of   SB0111- 11 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1    two-way audio visual communication) unless the accused 2    waives the right to be present physically in court, the 3    court determines that the physical health and safety of 4    any person necessary to the proceedings would be 5    endangered by appearing in court, or the chief judge of 6    the circuit orders use of that system due to operational 7    challenges in conducting the hearing in person. Such 8    operational challenges must be documented and approved by 9    the chief judge of the circuit, and a plan to address the 10    challenges through reasonable efforts must be presented 11    and approved by the Administrative Office of the Illinois 12    Courts every 6 months. 13        (4) If the defense seeks to compel the complaining 14    witness to testify as a witness in its favor, it shall 15    petition the court for permission. When the ends of 16    justice so require, the court may exercise its discretion 17    and compel the appearance of a complaining witness. The 18    court shall state on the record reasons for granting a 19    defense request to compel the presence of a complaining 20    witness only on the issue of the defendant's pretrial 21    detention. In making a determination under this Section, 22    the court shall state on the record the reason for 23    granting a defense request to compel the presence of a 24    complaining witness, and only grant the request if the 25    court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the 26    defendant will be materially prejudiced if the complaining   SB0111- 12 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1    witness does not appear. Cross-examination of a 2    complaining witness at the pretrial detention hearing for 3    the purpose of impeaching the witness' credibility is 4    insufficient reason to compel the presence of the witness. 5    In deciding whether to compel the appearance of a 6    complaining witness, the court shall be considerate of the 7    emotional and physical well-being of the witness. The 8    pre-trial detention hearing is not to be used for purposes 9    of discovery, and the post arraignment rules of discovery 10    do not apply. The State shall tender to the defendant, 11    prior to the hearing, copies, if any, of the defendant's 12    criminal history, if available, and any written or 13    recorded statements and the substance of any oral 14    statements made by any person, if in the State's 15    Attorney's possession at the time of the hearing. 16        (5) The rules concerning the admissibility of evidence 17    in criminal trials do not apply to the presentation and 18    consideration of information at the hearing. At the trial 19    concerning the offense for which the hearing was conducted 20    neither the finding of the court nor any transcript or 21    other record of the hearing shall be admissible in the 22    State's case-in-chief, but shall be admissible for 23    impeachment, or as provided in Section 115-10.1 of this 24    Code, or in a perjury proceeding.25        (6) The defendant may not move to suppress evidence or 26    a confession, however, evidence that proof of the charged   SB0111- 13 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1    crime may have been the result of an unlawful search or 2    seizure, or both, or through improper interrogation, is 3    relevant in assessing the weight of the evidence against 4    the defendant.5        (7) Decisions regarding release, conditions of 6    release, and detention prior to trial must be 7    individualized, and no single factor or standard may be 8    used exclusively to order detention. Risk assessment tools 9    may not be used as the sole basis to deny pretrial release. 10    (g) Factors to be considered in making a determination of 11dangerousness. The court may, in determining whether the 12defendant poses a real and present threat to the safety of any 13person or persons or the community, based on the specific 14articulable facts of the case, consider, but shall not be 15limited to, evidence or testimony concerning:16        (1) The nature and circumstances of any offense 17    charged, including whether the offense is a crime of 18    violence, involving a weapon, or a sex offense.19        (2) The history and characteristics of the defendant 20    including:21            (A) Any evidence of the defendant's prior criminal 22        history indicative of violent, abusive or assaultive 23        behavior, or lack of such behavior. Such evidence may 24        include testimony or documents received in juvenile 25        proceedings, criminal, quasi-criminal, civil 26        commitment, domestic relations, or other proceedings.  SB0111- 14 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1            (B) Any evidence of the defendant's psychological, 2        psychiatric or other similar social history which 3        tends to indicate a violent, abusive, or assaultive 4        nature, or lack of any such history.5        (3) The identity of any person or persons to whose 6    safety the defendant is believed to pose a threat, and the 7    nature of the threat.8        (4) Any statements made by, or attributed to the 9    defendant, together with the circumstances surrounding 10    them.11        (5) The age and physical condition of the defendant.12        (6) The age and physical condition of any victim or 13    complaining witness. 14        (7) Whether the defendant is known to possess or have 15    access to any weapon or weapons.16        (8) Whether, at the time of the current offense or any 17    other offense or arrest, the defendant was on probation, 18    parole, aftercare release, mandatory supervised release or 19    other release from custody pending trial, sentencing, 20    appeal or completion of sentence for an offense under 21    federal or state law.22        (9) Any other factors, including those listed in 23    Section 110-5 of this Article deemed by the court to have a 24    reasonable bearing upon the defendant's propensity or 25    reputation for violent, abusive, or assaultive behavior, 26    or lack of such behavior.  SB0111- 15 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1    (h) Detention order. The court shall, in any order for 2detention:3        (1) make a written finding summarizing the court's 4    reasons for concluding that the defendant should be denied 5    pretrial release, including why less restrictive 6    conditions would not avoid a real and present threat to 7    the safety of any person or persons or the community, 8    based on the specific articulable facts of the case, or 9    prevent the defendant's willful flight from prosecution;10        (2) direct that the defendant be committed to the 11    custody of the sheriff for confinement in the county jail 12    pending trial;13        (3) direct that the defendant be given a reasonable 14    opportunity for private consultation with counsel, and for 15    communication with others of his or her choice by 16    visitation, mail and telephone; and17        (4) direct that the sheriff deliver the defendant as 18    required for appearances in connection with court 19    proceedings.20    (i) Detention. If the court enters an order for the 21detention of the defendant pursuant to subsection (e) of this 22Section, the defendant shall be brought to trial on the 23offense for which he is detained within 90 days after the date 24on which the order for detention was entered. If the defendant 25is not brought to trial within the 90-day period required by 26the preceding sentence, he shall not be denied pretrial   SB0111- 16 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1release. In computing the 90-day period, the court shall omit 2any period of delay resulting from a continuance granted at 3the request of the defendant and any period of delay resulting 4from a continuance granted at the request of the State with 5good cause shown pursuant to Section 103-5.6    (i-5) At each subsequent appearance of the defendant 7before the court, the judge must find that continued detention 8is necessary to avoid a real and present threat to the safety 9of any person or persons or the community, based on the 10specific articulable facts of the case, or to prevent the 11defendant's willful flight from prosecution. 12    (j) Rights of the defendant. The defendant shall be 13entitled to appeal any order entered under this Section 14denying his or her pretrial release.15    (k) Appeal. The State may appeal any order entered under 16this Section denying any motion for denial of pretrial 17release.18    (l) Presumption of innocence. Nothing in this Section 19shall be construed as modifying or limiting in any way the 20defendant's presumption of innocence in further criminal 21proceedings.22    (m) Interest of victims. 23    (1) Crime victims shall be given notice by the State's 24Attorney's office of this hearing as required in paragraph (1) 25of subsection (b) of Section 4.5 of the Rights of Crime Victims 26and Witnesses Act and shall be informed of their opportunity   SB0111- 17 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1at this hearing to obtain a protective order. 2    (2) If the defendant is denied pretrial release, the court 3may impose a no contact provision with the victim or other 4interested party that shall be enforced while the defendant 5remains in custody. 6(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1104, eff. 1-1-23.) 7    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-822)8    Sec. 110-6.1. Denial of pretrial release. 9    (a) Upon verified petition by the State, the court shall 10hold a hearing and may deny a defendant pretrial release only 11if:12        (1) the defendant is charged with a felony offense 13    other than a forcible felony for which, based on the 14    charge or the defendant's criminal history, a sentence of 15    imprisonment, without probation, periodic imprisonment or 16    conditional discharge, is required by law upon conviction, 17    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release 18    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person 19    or persons or the community, based on the specific 20    articulable facts of the case;21        (1.5) the defendant's pretrial release poses a real 22    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 23    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts 24    of the case, and the defendant is charged with a forcible 25    felony, which as used in this Section, means treason,   SB0111- 18 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1    first degree murder, second degree murder, predatory 2    criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal 3    sexual assault, criminal sexual assault, armed robbery, 4    aggravated robbery, robbery, burglary where there is use 5    of force against another person, residential burglary, 6    home invasion, vehicular invasion, aggravated arson, 7    arson, aggravated kidnaping, kidnaping, aggravated battery 8    resulting in great bodily harm or permanent disability or 9    disfigurement or any other felony which involves the 10    threat of or infliction of great bodily harm or permanent 11    disability or disfigurement; 12        (2) the defendant is charged with stalking or 13    aggravated stalking, and it is alleged that the 14    defendant's pre-trial release poses a real and present 15    threat to the safety of a victim of the alleged offense, 16    and denial of release is necessary to prevent fulfillment 17    of the threat upon which the charge is based;18        (3) the defendant is charged with a violation of an 19    order of protection issued under Section 112A-14 of this 20    Code or Section 214 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act 21    of 1986, a stalking no contact order under Section 80 of 22    the Stalking No Contact Order Act, or of a civil no contact 23    order under Section 213 of the Civil No Contact Order Act, 24    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release 25    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person 26    or persons or the community, based on the specific   SB0111- 19 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1    articulable facts of the case;2        (4) the defendant is charged with domestic battery or 3    aggravated domestic battery under Section 12-3.2 or 12-3.3 4    of the Criminal Code of 2012 and it is alleged that the 5    defendant's pretrial release poses a real and present 6    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 7    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 8    case;9        (5) the defendant is charged with any offense under 10    Article 11 of the Criminal Code of 2012, except for 11    Sections 11-14, 11-14.1, 11-18, 11-20, 11-30, 11-35, 12    11-40, and 11-45 of the Criminal Code of 2012, or similar 13    provisions of the Criminal Code of 1961 and it is alleged 14    that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real and 15    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or 16    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 17    the case; 18        (6) the defendant is charged with any of the following 19    offenses under the Criminal Code of 2012, and it is 20    alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real 21    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 22    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts 23    of the case:24            (A) Section 24-1.2 (aggravated discharge of a 25        firearm);26            (B) Section 24-2.5 (aggravated discharge of a   SB0111- 20 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1        machine gun or a firearm equipped with a device 2        designed or use for silencing the report of a 3        firearm);4            (C) Section 24-1.5 (reckless discharge of a 5        firearm);6            (D) Section 24-1.7 (unlawful possession of a 7        firearm by a repeat felony offender);8            (E) Section 24-2.2 (manufacture, sale or transfer 9        of bullets or shells represented to be armor piercing 10        bullets, dragon's breath shotgun shells, bolo shells, 11        or flechette shells);12            (F) Section 24-3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 13        firearms);14            (G) Section 24-3.3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 15        firearms on the premises of any school);16            (H) Section 24-34 (unlawful sale of firearms by 17        liquor license);18            (I) Section 24-3.5 (unlawful purchase of a 19        firearm);20            (J) Section 24-3A (gunrunning);21            (K) Section 24-3B (firearms trafficking);22            (L) Section 10-9 (b) (involuntary servitude);23            (M) Section 10-9 (c) (involuntary sexual servitude 24        of a minor);25            (N) Section 10-9(d) (trafficking in persons);26            (O) Non-probationable violations: (i) unlawful   SB0111- 21 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1        possession of weapons by felons or persons in the 2        Custody of the Department of Corrections facilities 3        (Section 24-1.1), (ii) aggravated unlawful possession 4        of a weapon (Section 24-1.6), or (iii) aggravated 5        possession of a stolen firearm (Section 24-3.9); 6            (P) Section 9-3 (reckless homicide and involuntary 7        manslaughter);8            (Q) Section 19-3 (residential burglary);9            (R) Section 10-5 (child abduction);10            (S) Felony violations of Section 12C-5 (child 11        endangerment);12            (T) Section 12-7.1 (hate crime); 13            (U) Section 10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful 14        restraint); 15            (V) Section 12-9 (threatening a public official); 16            (W) Subdivision (f)(1) of Section 12-3.05 17        (aggravated battery with a deadly weapon other than by 18        discharge of a firearm); 19        (6.5) the defendant is charged with any of the 20    following offenses, and it is alleged that the defendant's 21    pretrial release poses a real and present threat to the 22    safety of any person or persons or the community, based on 23    the specific articulable facts of the case: 24            (A) Felony violations of Sections 3.01, 3.02, or 25        3.03 of the Humane Care for Animals Act (cruel 26        treatment, aggravated cruelty, and animal torture);  SB0111- 22 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1            (B) Subdivision (d)(1)(B) of Section 11-501 of the 2        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 3        influence while operating a school bus with 4        passengers);5            (C) Subdivision (d)(1)(C) of Section 11-501 of the 6        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 7        influence causing great bodily harm);8            (D) Subdivision (d)(1)(D) of Section 11-501 of the 9        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 10        influence after a previous reckless homicide 11        conviction);12            (E) Subdivision (d)(1)(F) of Section 11-501 of the 13        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 14        influence leading to death); or15            (F) Subdivision (d)(1)(J) of Section 11-501 of the 16        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 17        influence that resulted in bodily harm to a child 18        under the age of 16);19        (7) the defendant is charged with an attempt to commit 20    any charge listed in paragraphs (1) through (6.5), and it 21    is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a 22    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 23    persons or the community, based on the specific 24    articulable facts of the case; or 25        (8) the person has a high likelihood of willful flight 26    to avoid prosecution and is charged with:  SB0111- 23 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1            (A) Any felony described in subdivisions (a)(1) 2        through (a)(7) of this Section; or3            (B) A felony offense other than a Class 4 offense. 4    (b) If the charged offense is a felony, as part of the 5detention hearing, the court shall determine whether there is 6probable cause the defendant has committed an offense, unless 7a hearing pursuant to Section 109-3 of this Code has already 8been held or a grand jury has returned a true bill of 9indictment against the defendant. If there is a finding of no 10probable cause, the defendant shall be released. No such 11finding is necessary if the defendant is charged with a 12misdemeanor.13    (c) Timing of petition. 14        (1) A petition may be filed without prior notice to 15    the defendant at the first appearance before a judge, or 16    within the 21 calendar days, except as provided in Section 17    110-6, after arrest and release of the defendant upon 18    reasonable notice to defendant; provided that while such 19    petition is pending before the court, the defendant if 20    previously released shall not be detained.21        (2) Upon filing, the court shall immediately hold a 22    hearing on the petition unless a continuance is requested. 23    If a continuance is requested and granted, the hearing 24    shall be held within 72 48 hours of the defendant's first 25    appearance if the defendant is charged with first degree 26    murder or a Class X, Class 1, Class 2, or Class 3 felony,   SB0111- 24 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1    and within 24 hours if the defendant is charged with a 2    Class 4 or misdemeanor offense. The Court may deny or 3    grant the request for continuance. If the court decides to 4    grant the continuance, the Court retains the discretion to 5    detain or release the defendant in the time between the 6    filing of the petition and the hearing.7    (d) Contents of petition.8        (1) The petition shall be verified by the State and 9    shall state the grounds upon which it contends the 10    defendant should be denied pretrial release, including the 11    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 12    persons or the community, based on the specific 13    articulable facts or flight risk, as appropriate.14        (2) If the State seeks to file a second or subsequent 15    petition under this Section, the State shall be required 16    to present a verified application setting forth in detail 17    any new facts not known or obtainable at the time of the 18    filing of the previous petition.19    (e) Eligibility: All defendants shall be presumed eligible 20for pretrial release, and the State shall bear the burden of 21proving by clear and convincing evidence that:22        (1) the proof is evident or the presumption great that 23    the defendant has committed an offense listed in 24    subsection (a), and25        (2) for offenses listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) 26    of subsection (a), the defendant poses a real and present   SB0111- 25 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 2    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 3    case, by conduct which may include, but is not limited to, 4    a forcible felony, the obstruction of justice, 5    intimidation, injury, or abuse as defined by paragraph (1) 6    of Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 7    1986, and8        (3) no condition or combination of conditions set 9    forth in subsection (b) of Section 110-10 of this Article 10    can mitigate (i) the real and present threat to the safety 11    of any person or persons or the community, based on the 12    specific articulable facts of the case, for offenses 13    listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) of subsection (a), or 14    (ii) the defendant's willful flight for offenses listed in 15    paragraph (8) of subsection (a), and16        (4) for offenses under subsection (b) of Section 407 17    of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act that are subject 18    to paragraph (1) of subsection (a), no condition or 19    combination of conditions set forth in subsection (b) of 20    Section 110-10 of this Article can mitigate the real and 21    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or 22    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 23    the case, and the defendant poses a serious risk to not 24    appear in court as required.25    (f) Conduct of the hearings.26        (1) Prior to the hearing, the State shall tender to   SB0111- 26 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1    the defendant copies of the defendant's criminal history 2    available, any written or recorded statements, and the 3    substance of any oral statements made by any person, if 4    relied upon by the State in its petition, and any police 5    reports in the prosecutor's possession at the time of the 6    hearing.7        (2) The State or defendant may present evidence at the 8    hearing by way of proffer based upon reliable information.9        (3) The defendant has the right to be represented by 10    counsel, and if he or she is indigent, to have counsel 11    appointed for him or her. The defendant shall have the 12    opportunity to testify, to present witnesses on his or her 13    own behalf, and to cross-examine any witnesses that are 14    called by the State. Defense counsel shall be given 15    adequate opportunity to confer with the defendant before 16    any hearing at which conditions of release or the 17    detention of the defendant are to be considered, with an 18    accommodation for a physical condition made to facilitate 19    attorney/client consultation. If defense counsel needs to 20    confer or consult with the defendant during any hearing 21    conducted via a two-way audio-visual communication system, 22    such consultation shall not be recorded and shall be 23    undertaken consistent with constitutional protections. 24        (3.5) A hearing at which pretrial release may be 25    denied must be conducted in person (and not by way of 26    two-way audio visual communication) unless the accused   SB0111- 27 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1    waives the right to be present physically in court, the 2    court determines that the physical health and safety of 3    any person necessary to the proceedings would be 4    endangered by appearing in court, or the chief judge of 5    the circuit orders use of that system due to operational 6    challenges in conducting the hearing in person. Such 7    operational challenges must be documented and approved by 8    the chief judge of the circuit, and a plan to address the 9    challenges through reasonable efforts must be presented 10    and approved by the Administrative Office of the Illinois 11    Courts every 6 months. 12        (4) If the defense seeks to compel the complaining 13    witness to testify as a witness in its favor, it shall 14    petition the court for permission. When the ends of 15    justice so require, the court may exercise its discretion 16    and compel the appearance of a complaining witness. The 17    court shall state on the record reasons for granting a 18    defense request to compel the presence of a complaining 19    witness only on the issue of the defendant's pretrial 20    detention. In making a determination under this Section, 21    the court shall state on the record the reason for 22    granting a defense request to compel the presence of a 23    complaining witness, and only grant the request if the 24    court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the 25    defendant will be materially prejudiced if the complaining 26    witness does not appear. Cross-examination of a   SB0111- 28 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1    complaining witness at the pretrial detention hearing for 2    the purpose of impeaching the witness' credibility is 3    insufficient reason to compel the presence of the witness. 4    In deciding whether to compel the appearance of a 5    complaining witness, the court shall be considerate of the 6    emotional and physical well-being of the witness. The 7    pre-trial detention hearing is not to be used for purposes 8    of discovery, and the post arraignment rules of discovery 9    do not apply. The State shall tender to the defendant, 10    prior to the hearing, copies, if any, of the defendant's 11    criminal history, if available, and any written or 12    recorded statements and the substance of any oral 13    statements made by any person, if in the State's 14    Attorney's possession at the time of the hearing. 15        (5) The rules concerning the admissibility of evidence 16    in criminal trials do not apply to the presentation and 17    consideration of information at the hearing. At the trial 18    concerning the offense for which the hearing was conducted 19    neither the finding of the court nor any transcript or 20    other record of the hearing shall be admissible in the 21    State's case-in-chief, but shall be admissible for 22    impeachment, or as provided in Section 115-10.1 of this 23    Code, or in a perjury proceeding.24        (6) The defendant may not move to suppress evidence or 25    a confession, however, evidence that proof of the charged 26    crime may have been the result of an unlawful search or   SB0111- 29 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1    seizure, or both, or through improper interrogation, is 2    relevant in assessing the weight of the evidence against 3    the defendant.4        (7) Decisions regarding release, conditions of 5    release, and detention prior to trial must be 6    individualized, and no single factor or standard may be 7    used exclusively to order detention. Risk assessment tools 8    may not be used as the sole basis to deny pretrial release. 9    (g) Factors to be considered in making a determination of 10dangerousness. The court may, in determining whether the 11defendant poses a real and present threat to the safety of any 12person or persons or the community, based on the specific 13articulable facts of the case, consider, but shall not be 14limited to, evidence or testimony concerning:15        (1) The nature and circumstances of any offense 16    charged, including whether the offense is a crime of 17    violence, involving a weapon, or a sex offense.18        (2) The history and characteristics of the defendant 19    including:20            (A) Any evidence of the defendant's prior criminal 21        history indicative of violent, abusive or assaultive 22        behavior, or lack of such behavior. Such evidence may 23        include testimony or documents received in juvenile 24        proceedings, criminal, quasi-criminal, civil 25        commitment, domestic relations, or other proceedings.26            (B) Any evidence of the defendant's psychological,   SB0111- 30 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1        psychiatric or other similar social history which 2        tends to indicate a violent, abusive, or assaultive 3        nature, or lack of any such history.4        (3) The identity of any person or persons to whose 5    safety the defendant is believed to pose a threat, and the 6    nature of the threat.7        (4) Any statements made by, or attributed to the 8    defendant, together with the circumstances surrounding 9    them.10        (5) The age and physical condition of the defendant.11        (6) The age and physical condition of any victim or 12    complaining witness. 13        (7) Whether the defendant is known to possess or have 14    access to any weapon or weapons.15        (8) Whether, at the time of the current offense or any 16    other offense or arrest, the defendant was on probation, 17    parole, aftercare release, mandatory supervised release or 18    other release from custody pending trial, sentencing, 19    appeal or completion of sentence for an offense under 20    federal or state law.21        (9) Any other factors, including those listed in 22    Section 110-5 of this Article deemed by the court to have a 23    reasonable bearing upon the defendant's propensity or 24    reputation for violent, abusive, or assaultive behavior, 25    or lack of such behavior.26    (h) Detention order. The court shall, in any order for   SB0111- 31 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1detention:2        (1) make a written finding summarizing the court's 3    reasons for concluding that the defendant should be denied 4    pretrial release, including why less restrictive 5    conditions would not avoid a real and present threat to 6    the safety of any person or persons or the community, 7    based on the specific articulable facts of the case, or 8    prevent the defendant's willful flight from prosecution;9        (2) direct that the defendant be committed to the 10    custody of the sheriff for confinement in the county jail 11    pending trial;12        (3) direct that the defendant be given a reasonable 13    opportunity for private consultation with counsel, and for 14    communication with others of his or her choice by 15    visitation, mail and telephone; and16        (4) direct that the sheriff deliver the defendant as 17    required for appearances in connection with court 18    proceedings.19    (i) Detention. If the court enters an order for the 20detention of the defendant pursuant to subsection (e) of this 21Section, the defendant shall be brought to trial on the 22offense for which he is detained within 90 days after the date 23on which the order for detention was entered. If the defendant 24is not brought to trial within the 90-day period required by 25the preceding sentence, he shall not be denied pretrial 26release. In computing the 90-day period, the court shall omit   SB0111- 32 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1any period of delay resulting from a continuance granted at 2the request of the defendant and any period of delay resulting 3from a continuance granted at the request of the State with 4good cause shown pursuant to Section 103-5.5    (i-5) At each subsequent appearance of the defendant 6before the court, the judge must find that continued detention 7is necessary to avoid a real and present threat to the safety 8of any person or persons or the community, based on the 9specific articulable facts of the case, or to prevent the 10defendant's willful flight from prosecution. 11    (j) Rights of the defendant. The defendant shall be 12entitled to appeal any order entered under this Section 13denying his or her pretrial release.14    (k) Appeal. The State may appeal any order entered under 15this Section denying any motion for denial of pretrial 16release.17    (l) Presumption of innocence. Nothing in this Section 18shall be construed as modifying or limiting in any way the 19defendant's presumption of innocence in further criminal 20proceedings.21    (m) Interest of victims. 22    (1) Crime victims shall be given notice by the State's 23Attorney's office of this hearing as required in paragraph (1) 24of subsection (b) of Section 4.5 of the Rights of Crime Victims 25and Witnesses Act and shall be informed of their opportunity 26at this hearing to obtain a protective order.   SB0111- 33 -LRB104 03085 RLC 13103 b1    (2) If the defendant is denied pretrial release, the court 2may impose a no contact provision with the victim or other 3interested party that shall be enforced while the defendant 4remains in custody. 5(Source: P.A. 102-1104, eff. 1-1-23; 103-822, eff. 1-1-25.) 6    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 7changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 8that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 9represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 10not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 11made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 12Public Act.